Utah statutes.
7-22-104.   Net worth requirements.

An escrow agent shall at all times maintain a positive net worth no less than the greater of $50,000 or 10% of the agent's average daily escrow liabilities during the preceding 12 months, or during all preceding operations if less than 12 months.  For purposes of this section, net worth shall be calculated in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.



Enacted by Chapter 133, 1991 General Session

